Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-974
National Career Readiness Certificate Pilot Program.

(1) The National Career Readiness Certificate Pilot Program is created. The program shall be administered by the Department of Correctional Services. The department shall collaborate with enterprises offering justice-involved individuals the chance to acquire the National Career Readiness Certificate, a broadly recognized credential substantiating key skills across various industries and roles.

(2) The department shall evaluate the success of the program for each fiscal year and electronically submit a report of such evaluation to the Clerk of the Legislature on or before June 30, 2025, and on or before June 30, 2026.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund for each of fiscal years 2024-25 and 2025-26 to the department for expenditure and distribution to aid in carrying out the pilot program.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 45.
July 19, 2024